Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4402.03
Control and prevention of rabies; rules and regulations.

To protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public and to ensure, to the greatest extent possible, efficient and adequate practices, the department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the control and prevention of rabies. Such rules and regulations shall generally comply with the compendium and the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Public Health Service of the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The department may consider changes in the compendium and recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Public Health Service of the United States Department of Health and Human Services when adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations.

Laws 2007, LB25, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB61, § 2.